Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Article 2.
Extended Personal Jurisdiction.

§ 20-88.35. Bases for jurisdiction over nonresident.

In a proceeding to establish or enforce a support order or to determine parentage of a child, a tribunal of the Commonwealth may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual or the individual's guardian or conservator if:

The individual is personally served with process within the Commonwealth;

The individual submits to the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth by consent, by entering a general appearance, or by filing a responsive document having the effect of waiving any contest to personal jurisdiction;

The individual resided with the child in the Commonwealth;

The individual resided in the Commonwealth and paid prenatal expenses or provided support for the child;

The child resides in the Commonwealth as a result of the acts or directives of the individual;

The individual engaged in sexual intercourse in the Commonwealth and the child may have been conceived by the act of intercourse;

The individual asserted parentage of a child in the Virginia Birth Father Registry maintained in the Commonwealth by the Department of Social Services;

The exercise of personal jurisdiction is authorized under subdivision A 8 of § 8.01-328.1; or

There is any other basis consistent with the constitutions of the Commonwealth and the United States for the exercise of personal jurisdiction.

The bases of personal jurisdiction set forth in this section or any other law of the Commonwealth may not be used to acquire personal jurisdiction for a tribunal of the Commonwealth to modify a child support order issued by a tribunal of another state unless the requirements of § 20-88.76 or 20-88.77:3 are met.

(1994, c. 673; 2005, c. 754; 2015, c. 727; 2017, c. 200.)

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 deleted "or modify" following "enforce" in the first paragraph, added the second paragraph of subdivision 7, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 727, effective April 15, 2015, inserted "of a child" in the first sentence; added subdivisions 6 and 7 and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2017 amendments.

- The 2017 amendment by c. 200 substituted "Virginia Birth Father Registry" for "putative father registry" in subdivision 7.

§ 20-88.36. Duration of personal jurisdiction.

Personal jurisdiction acquired by a tribunal of the Commonwealth in a proceeding under this chapter or other law of the Commonwealth relating to a support order continues as long as a tribunal of the Commonwealth has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its order or continuing jurisdiction to enforce its order as provided by §§ 20-88.39, 20-88.40 and 20-88.43:2.

(1994, c. 673; 1995, c. 484; 2005, c. 754.)

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 754 rewrote the section.